Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.520

Community juvenile accountability programs—Grants.

(1) The state may make grants to local governments for the provision of community-based programs for juvenile offenders. The grants must be made under a grant formula developed by the department, in consultation with the Washington association of juvenile court administrators.

(2) Upon certification by the department that a proposal satisfies the application and selection criteria, grant funds will be distributed to the local government agency that administers funding for consolidated juvenile services.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 622; 1997 c 338 s 62.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338 ss 60-64: See note following RCW 13.40.500.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.